Hawaii statutes.
§431:4-210 Unlawful sales of equity
security. It shall be unlawful for any beneficial owner, director or
officer, directly or indirectly, to sell any equity security of such company if
the person selling the security or the person's principal (1) does not own the
security sold, or (2) if owning the security, does not deliver it against such
sale within twenty days thereafter, or does not within five days after such
sale deposit it in the mails or other usual channels of transportation. No
person shall be deemed to have violated this section if the person proves that
notwithstanding the exercise of good faith the person was unable to make such
delivery or deposit within the time, or that to do so would cause undue
inconvenience or expense. [L 1987, c 347, pt of §2]

Previous
Vol09_Ch0431-0435H
Next